dictsource/qla_rules
//translation rules for Lineparine

.L01 dz x ch sh
.L02 a e i o u y
.L03 a e o u

.group a
     _) a (_  a:
        a     a
        ar    a:

.group b
     _) b (_  be:
        b     b

.group c
     _) c (_  se:
        c     s
        ch    tS

.group d
     _) d (_  de:
        d     d
        dz    dZ
        dh    D
        d(dz  dZ
        d(dh  D

.group e
     _) e (_  e
        e     e
        en (_ @n
     _) en (_ en
        er    e:

.group f
     _) f (_  fe:
     _) fh (_ Pe:
        f     f
        fh    P

.group g
     _) g (_  ge:
        g     g

.group h
     _) h (_  he:
        h     h

.group i
     _) i (_  i
        i     i
   L01) i (L02
   L02) ir    i:
   L02) i     j
        i (L02 j
        ir    i:

.group j
     _) j (_  je:
        j     j
     K) j (K  i
     y) j     j
        j (y  j

.group k
     _) k (_  ke:
        k     k
        kh    x

.group l
     _) l (_  le:
        l     l
     l) l

.group m
     _) m (_  me:
        m     m

.group n
     _) n (_  ne:
        n     n
        n (i  n^
        n (j  n^
        ng    N

.group o
     _) o (_  o:
        o     o
        or    o:

.group p
     _) p (_  pe:
        p     p
        ph    p

.group q
     _) q (_  kwe:
        q     kw

.group r
     _) r (_  Re:
        r     R
        rkh   X
     K) rl    r
     _) rl    r

.group s
     _) s (_  ze:
        s     s
        s (L02 z
     s) s (_
        s (j  z
        s (x  S
        sh    S
        sti (_S3t st%i:

.group t
     _) t (_  te:
        t     t
        t (z  ts
        ts    ts
        th    T

.group u
     _) u (_  u:
        u     u
   L03) u     w
     i) u     u
     y) u     u
   L02) ur    u:
        ur    u:

.group v
     _) v (_  ve:
     _) vh (_ Be:
        v     v
        vh    B

.group w
     _) w (_  we:
        w     w

.group x
     _) x (_  Se:
        x     S

.group y
     _) y (_  y
        y     y
        yr    y:
        y (L03 j

.group z
     _) z (_  tse:
        z     ts

.group '
        'd (_S2m d
        'i (_S2t %i

.group
        ъ
        $     'ledZ
